Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 8

Schools

6-21-801. Authority of city manager.

The city manager of any municipality incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title has full power to manage and control the public or city schools.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a236; Code 1932, § 3634; modified; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2137.

Cross-References. Municipal schools, title 49, ch. 2, part 4.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-21-802. Officers and employees.

The city manager shall appoint, prescribe the duties and powers of, and fix the salary of the director of schools of the city and appoint, fix the salaries of, and have power to remove, all other officers and all teachers, agents, and employees of the department of education.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a237; Code 1932, § 3635; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2138.

6-21-803. Building plans.

All plans for the erection or improvement of school buildings or other buildings used for educational purposes shall be subject to the approval of the city manager.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a239; Code 1932, § 3637; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2140.

6-21-804. Equipment and supplies.

All materials, supplies, and equipment for educational purposes shall be purchased by the city manager.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a240; Code 1932, § 3638; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2141.

6-21-805. State and county school funds.

In apportioning the state and county school funds of the county, the county board of education, or other apportioning and disbursing body, shall apportion and pay over to the treasurer of the city such portion of the state and county school funds as by law is applicable to the schools within the limits of the city.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1997a241; Code 1932, § 3639; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2142.

Cross-References. Education finances, title 49, ch. 3.

6-21-806. Disbursements from school fund.

The board of commissioners shall provide by ordinance for the manner in which the state, county, and city taxes apportioned to the school fund shall be paid over by the city treasurer.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 20, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 1997a242; Code 1932, § 3640; Acts 1955, ch. 121, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2143.

6-21-807. Board of education — Election — Powers.

Sections 6-21-801 and 6-21-802 notwithstanding, the board of commissioners, by ordinance, may delegate the power to manage and control the city public schools to an elected board of education.

The board of education shall have the same number of members as the board of commissioners and shall be elected on the same day and in the same manner as the board of commissioners.

If the board of commissioners is elected by district, the board of education shall also be elected by district.

The board shall exercise the power otherwise granted to the city manager in this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 18.